Hawaii statutes.
§514A-35 Waiver of inspection. The
commission may waive an inspection when in its opinion, a preliminary,
contingent final, final, or supplementary public report can be substantially
drafted and issued from the contents of the questionnaire and other or
subsequent inquiries. [L 1977, c 98, pt of §2; gen ch 1985; am L 1991, c 44,
§6; am L 1997, c 135, §6]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next